Florida, session 2026, SB1544.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 29 30 Section 1.âParagraph (d) of subsection (1) and subsection 31 (4) of section 112.532, Florida Statutes, are amended, and 32 subsection (8) is added to that section, to read: 33 112.532âLaw enforcement officersâ and correctional 34 officersâ rights.âAll law enforcement officers and correctional 35 officers employed by or appointed to a law enforcement agency or 36 a correctional agency shall have the following rights and 37 privileges: 38 (1)âRIGHTS OF LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS AND CORRECTIONAL 39 OFFICERS WHILE UNDER INVESTIGATION.âWhenever a law enforcement 40 officer or correctional officer is under investigation and 41 subject to interrogation by members of his or her agency for any 42 reason that could lead to disciplinary action, suspension, 43 demotion, or dismissal, the interrogation must be conducted 44 under the following conditions: 45 (d)âThe law enforcement officer or correctional officer 46 under investigation must be informed of the nature of the 47 investigation and the names of all complainants and must be 48 provided with a copy of the complaint, signed by the complainant 49 under oath, before any interrogation begins, and he or she must 50 be informed of the names of all complainants. However, if a 51 complaint is accompanied by corroborating evidence, the 52 complainant names and a signature are not required. All 53 identifiable witnesses shall be interviewed, whenever possible, 54 prior to the beginning of the investigative interview of the 55 accused officer. The complaint, all witness statements, 56 including all other existing subject officer statements, and all 57 other existing evidence, including, but not limited to, incident 58 reports, GPS locator information, and audio or video recordings 59 relating to the incident under investigation, must be provided 60 to each officer who is the subject of the complaint before the 61 beginning of any investigative interview of that officer. An 62 officer, after being informed of the right to review witness 63 statements, may voluntarily waive the provisions of this 64 paragraph and provide a voluntary statement at any time. 65 (4)âNOTICE OF DISCIPLINARY ACTION; COPY OF AND OPPORTUNITY 66 TO ADDRESS CONTENTS OF INVESTIGATIVE FILE; CONFIDENTIALITY.â 67 (a)âA dismissal, demotion, transfer, reassignment, or other 68 personnel action that might result in loss of pay or benefits or 69 that might otherwise be considered a punitive measure may not be 70 taken against any law enforcement officer or correctional 71 officer unless the law enforcement officer or correctional 72 officer is notified of the action and the reason or reasons for 73 the action and is provided with a copy of the complaint, signed 74 by the complainant under oath, unless the exception in paragraph 75 (1)(d) applies, before the effective date of the action. 76 (b)âNotwithstanding s. 112.533(5), whenever a law 77 enforcement officer or correctional officer is subject to 78 disciplinary action consisting of suspension with loss of pay, 79 demotion, or dismissal, the officer or the officerâs 80 representative must, upon request, be provided with a complete 81 copy of the investigative file, including the complaint signed 82 by the complainant under oath, the final investigative report, 83 and all evidence, and with the opportunity to address the 84 findings in the report with the employing law enforcement agency 85 before imposing disciplinary action consisting of suspension 86 with loss of pay, demotion, or dismissal. The contents of the 87 complaint and investigation must remain confidential until such 88 time as the employing law enforcement agency makes a final 89 determination whether to issue a notice of disciplinary action 90 consisting of suspension with loss of pay, demotion, or 91 dismissal. This paragraph does not provide law enforcement 92 officers with a property interest or expectancy of continued 93 employment, employment, or appointment as a law enforcement 94 officer. 95 (8)âRIGHTS OF LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS AND CORRECTIONAL 96 OFFICERS AFTER AN INVESTIGATION.âThe investigative file produced 97 during an investigation of a law enforcement or correctional 98 officer, which investigation does not result in the imposition 99 of disciplinary action on the officer, must be included in the 100 personnel file of such officer. An investigation of a law 101 enforcement officer or correctional officer which does not 102 result in the imposition of disciplinary action on the officer 103 does not affect the ability of such officer to receive a 104 promotion, a raise, or any other commendation. 105 Section 2.âParagraph (a) of subsection (4) of section 106 112.533, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 107 112.533âReceipt and processing of complaints.â 108 (4)(a)âEvery law enforcement agency and correctional agency 109 shall establish and put into operation a system for the receipt, 110 investigation, and determination of complaints received by such 111 agency from any person, which must be the procedure for 112 investigating a complaint against a law enforcement or 113 correctional officer and for determining whether to proceed with 114 disciplinary action or to file disciplinary charges, 115 notwithstanding any other law or ordinance to the contrary. A 116 complaint against a law enforcement or correctional officer must 117 be in writing and be signed under oath as provided in s. 118 92.525(2) by the person filing the complaint, except as provided 119 in s. 112.532(1)(d). A complainant who makes a false complaint 120 is subject to the penalties in s. 92.525(3). When law 121 enforcement or correctional agency personnel assigned the 122 responsibility of investigating the complaint prepare an 123 investigative report or summary, regardless of form, the person 124 preparing the report shall, at the time the report is completed: 125 1.âVerify pursuant to s. 92.525 that the contents of the 126 report are true and accurate based upon the personâs personal 127 knowledge, information, and belief. 128 2.âInclude the following statement, sworn and subscribed to 129 pursuant to s. 92.525: 130 131 âI, the undersigned, do hereby swear, under penalty of perjury, 132 that, to the best of my personal knowledge, information, and 133 belief, I have not knowingly or willfully deprived, or allowed 134 another to deprive, the subject of the investigation of any of 135 the rights contained in ss. 112.532 and 112.533, Florida 136 Statutes.â 137 138 The requirements of subparagraphs 1. and 2. must be completed 139 before the determination as to whether to proceed with 140 disciplinary action or to file disciplinary charges. This 141 subsection does not preclude the Criminal Justice Standards and 142 Training Commission from exercising its authority under chapter 143 943. 144 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.